Illinois, session 104th, HB3414.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by adding Section 92 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 9/92 new)7    Sec. 92. Incident and accident reporting. An establishment 8must report to the Department any incident or accident that 9results in significant physical harm or injury to a resident 10or any situation where a resident requires immediate medical 11attention, including admission to the hospital, as a direct 12result of an incident or accident. A change in a resident's 13condition that is due to health or medical decline is not a 14reportable incident or accident.